Louisiana, session 2026, HB378.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:100.1(C) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 14:100.1(D)
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§100.1. Obstructing public passages
* * *
C. Whoever violates the provisions of this Section using a motorized vehicle
with the intent to hinder, delay, hamper, obstruct, or impede a first responder as
defined in R.S. 40:1372 when the first responder is acting in the course and scope of
his duty shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars or imprisoned not more
than six months, or both.
C. D. This Section shall not be applicable does not apply to the erection or
construction of any barricades or other forms of obstructions as a safety measure in
connection with construction, excavation, maintenance, repair, replacement, or other
work in or adjacent to any public sidewalk, street, highway, bridge, alley, road, or
other passageway, nor to the placing of barricades or other forms of obstruction by
governmental authorities, or any officer or agent thereof, in the proper performance
of duties.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-445 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 378